Utah statutes.
4-24-4.   Livestock Brand Board created -- Composition -- Terms -- Removal
-- Quorum for transaction of business -- Compensation -- Duties.
(1)  There is created the Livestock Brand Board consisting of seven members
appointed by the governor as follows:
(a)  four cattle ranchers recommended by the Utah Cattlemen's Association, one
of whom shall be a feeder operator;
(b)  one dairyman recommended by the Utah Dairymen's Association;
(c)  one livestock market operator recommended jointly by the Utah Cattlemen's
Association and the Utah Dairymen's Association and the Livestock Market
Association; and
(d)  one horse breeder recommended by the Utah Horse Council.
(2)  If a nominee is rejected by the governor, the recommending association
shall submit another nominee.
(3) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (3)(b), as terms of current board
members expire, the governor shall appoint each new member or reappointed
member to a four-year term.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), the governor
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately
half of the board is appointed every two years.
(4) (a)  A member may, at the discretion of the governor, be removed at the
request of the association that recommended the appointment.
(b)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(5)  One member elected by the board shall serve as chair for a term of one
year and be responsible for the call and conduct of meetings of the Livestock
Brand Board.  Attendance of a simple majority of the members at a duly called
meeting shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of official business.
(6)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(7)  The Livestock Brand Board with the cooperation of the department shall
direct the procedures and policies to be followed in administering and
enforcing this chapter.
